Utah statutes.
73-12a-1.   Ratification.

That certain compact and treaty approved by a representative of the United States of America and negotiated and entered into by representatives of the states of Utah, Wyoming, Colorado, New Mexico, Arizona, Nevada and California, sitting as the Colorado River Commission, which compact and treaty apportions the waters of the Colorado river, and which commission was created in conformity with Laws of Utah 1921, Chapter 68, and similar acts of the legislatures of the several respective states named and of the Congress of the United States, is hereby approved, confirmed, and ratified for and by the state of Utah.



Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session

